District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-205.62

Establishment of a Demonstration Project.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 562
as added Oct. 27, 1995, D.C. Law 11-72, § 101, 42 DCR 4728
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 4(b), 46 DCR 905

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-205.62.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 4(b) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary repeal of section, see § 4(b) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 4(b) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislature Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682), § 4(b) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 4(b) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).